Kentucky statutes. TITLE III Executive Branch
Persons with Disabilities

12.450.
Definition of “disability” for KRS 12.450 to 12.465.

As used in KRS

12.450

to

12.465

, unless the context requires otherwise:

“Disability” means, with respect to an individual:

A physical or mental impairment that substantially limits one (1) or more of the major life activities of the individual;

A record of such an impairment; or

Being regarded as having such an impairment.

Persons with current or past controlled substance abuse or alcohol abuse problems and persons excluded from coverage by the Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990 (Pub. L. No. 101-336) shall be excluded from the definition set out in subsection (1) of this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 1996, ch. 336, § 1, effective July 15, 1996.

12.455.
Legislative findings.

The General Assembly recognizes that many persons with disabilities and their families receive some level of support and services that are funded or administered by state agencies. The support and services are provided to persons with disabilities or their families, if appropriate, either directly or through arrangements with local community-based vendors, organizations, or agencies.

The General Assembly recognizes that persons with disabilities who receive the services and support, directly or indirectly, are often not consulted for their perspectives, nor are their viewpoints sought regarding the efficiency, strengths, or weaknesses of the services and support.

Persons with disabilities and their families face obstacles in the court system through lack of understanding and difficulty of access.

Various agencies in state government promulgate standards that govern the administration or operation of the services and support. Seldom are persons with disabilities or their families involved in the development of standards that directly affect the quality of the services and support that they receive. In addition, there are legislative commissions that serve in an advisory capacity concerning the services provided to persons with disabilities and their families, whose membership does not include persons with disabilities and their families.

It is the finding of the General Assembly that:

Some forms of discrimination against persons with disabilities continue. These persons are a discrete minority who have been faced with restrictions and limitations, subjected to a history of purposeful unequal treatment, and relegated to a position of political powerlessness in our society;

Persons with disabilities and their families have a significant contribution to make in the decision-making processes that shape the support and services they receive through state government;

Persons with disabilities and their families should be provided with meaningful opportunities to contribute their perspectives through their experiences concerning issues relating to services, support, and standards that ultimately affect them;

Services and support should be responsive and sensitive to the cultural, racial, age, language, and gender characteristics of persons with disabilities and their families; and

Meaningful opportunities to contribute their perspectives will help provide adequate information in a manner that facilitates and allows for participation by persons with disabilities and their families.

History.

Enact. Acts 1996, ch. 336, § 2, effective July 15, 1996.

12.460.
Persons with disabilities or members of their families to be included in membership of boards and committees affecting them — Prohibition against discrimination.

To ensure opportunities for participation by persons with disabilities and their families in the development of policies, support, and services that affect them:

Persons with one (1) or more disabilities, or members of their families, who receive the services and support of an advisory board, committee, commission, task force, or ad hoc committee of any executive cabinet or any of its subdivisions shall be included in the membership of each of these advisory boards, committees, commissions, task forces, or ad hoc committees.

Persons with one (1) or more disabilities, or members of their families, shall be included in the membership of local community-based agency governing boards that receive funds directly or indirectly from any executive cabinet or any of its subdivisions to provide services and support to persons with disabilities and their families.

Persons with one (1) or more disabilities, or members of their families, shall be included in the membership of any advisory committee, board, or commission funded or administered by any executive cabinet or any of its subdivisions whose purpose is to establish criteria for services and support for persons with disabilities, or to develop standards that govern these services and support.

Persons with one (1) or more disabilities shall not be discriminated against and shall be given an equal opportunity for membership on any other advisory board, committee, commission, task force, or ad hoc committee consistent with and to the extent required by the Federal Americans with Disabilities Act;

The requirements of this section and KRS

12.465

shall only apply to an advisory board, committee, commission, task force, or ad hoc committee that is created specifically to develop or oversee policies or programs related to persons living with a disability or their families, except that the provisions of subsection (4) of this section shall apply.

History.

Enact. Acts 1996, ch. 336, § 3, effective July 15, 1996; 2001, ch. 164, § 13, effective June 21, 2001.

12.461.
Employment in state agency decision-making positions and participation in programs consistent with the Federal Americans with Disabilities Act — Disability awareness program.

To ensure that Kentuckians with disabilities and their families enjoy full partnership in all programs, services, and activities throughout the Commonwealth:

Consistent with this subsection, consideration shall be given to persons with one (1) or more disabilities for employment in decision-making positions in every program, cabinet, department, and agency of state government. Persons with one (1) or more disabilities shall not be discriminated against and shall be given an equal opportunity to be employed in decision-making positions in every program, cabinet, department, and agency of state government consistent with and to the extent required by the Federal Americans with Disabilities Act;

Individuals with disabilities shall be given equal opportunity to participate in the programs, services, and activities of state government consistent with and to the extent required by the Federal Americans with Disabilities Act;

If not already a part of staff development training for state government, a program shall be developed within the Personnel Cabinet containing a disability awareness component;

Consistent with this subsection, consideration shall be given to persons with one (1) or more disabilities for employment in decision-making positions in any community-based agency that receives funds from any executive cabinet or any of its subdivisions. Persons with one (1) or more disabilities shall not be discriminated against and shall be given an equal opportunity to be employed in decision-making positions in any community-based agency that receives funds from any executive cabinet or any of its subdivisions consistent with and to the extent required by the Federal Americans with Disabilities Act;

If program evaluation criteria is utilized by any community-based agency that receives funds from any executive cabinet or any of its subdivisions for its programs, services, and activities, the criteria may include in the measures of performance, the number of individuals served by the program, service, or activity;

Individuals with disabilities shall be given equal opportunity to participate in the programs, services, and activities of community-based agencies that receive funds from any executive cabinet or any of its subdivisions consistent with and to the extent required by the Federal Americans with Disabilities Act;

If a community-based agency that receives funds from any executive cabinet or any of its subdivisions engages in staff development and training, that community-based agency shall include a program with a disability awareness component;

If a community-based agency that receives funds from any executive cabinet or any of its subdivisions utilizes program evaluation criteria, those criteria may include in any measures of performance, the number of individuals served by the program, service, or activity.

History.

Enact. Acts 2001, ch. 164, § 12, effective June 21, 2001.

12.465.
Board and committee positions affected.

The requirements of KRS

12.450

to

12.465

shall affect all boards, committees, commissions, task forces, or ad hoc committees created on or after June 21, 2001.

For boards, committees, commissions, task forces, or ad hoc committees in existence prior to June 21, 2001, any vacancy arising on or after June 21, 2001, shall be filled pursuant to KRS

12.460

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1996, ch. 336, § 4, effective July 15, 1996; 2001, ch. 164, § 14, effective June 21, 2001.